Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-703
Damages; ascertainment; procedure.

Damages to be paid by the condemner for any property including parts of or easements across rights-of-way of a public utility or a railroad taken through the exercise of the power of eminent domain shall be ascertained and determined as provided in sections 76-704 to 76-724, except that if it is sought to condemn the property, or such part thereof as will result in a decrease in the territory or volume of service, of a public utility engaged in the rendition of existing service, such damages shall be ascertained and determined as provided in sections 19-701 to 19-707 and 70-650 or the Municipal Natural Gas System Condemnation Act, when applicable.

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 3, p. 453;

Laws 1961, c. 181, § 11, p. 543;

Laws 2002, LB 384, § 31.

Municipal Natural Gas System Condemnation Act, see section 19-4624.

Property of a public utility engaged in the rendition of existingservice:

Cities of the metropolitan class, see section 14-376.

Cities of the primary, first, and second classes and villages, see sections 19-701 to 19-707.